New York, session 2025-2026, A450.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "school bus 2 route efficiency act". 3 § 2. Paragraph g of subdivision 14 of section 305 of the education 4 law, as added by section 12-a of part YYY of chapter 59 of the laws of 5 2019, is amended to read as follows: 6 g. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subdivision, section one 7 hundred three of the general municipal law, or any other provision of 8 law to the contrary, the board of education shall be authorized to enter 9 into a piggyback contract with another school district that transports 10 students pursuant to a contract with a private transportation contrac- 11 tor, provided that the board finds that the contract cost is appropriate 12 [and entry into a piggyback contract will result in a cost savings to 13 the school district]. For purposes of this paragraph, a "piggyback 14 contract" means a contract for the transportation of students that: (1) 15 provides transportation for one school district to a location outside 16 the students' school district of residence [to which another school 17 district is already providing transportation to its own students through 18 an existing contract with a private transportation contractor, other 19 than a cooperatively bid contract]; (2) provides transportation for 20 another school district for its own students to the same or nearby 21 locations through a contract with a private transportation contractor; 22 (3) is entered into by the private transportation contractor and each 23 school district involved; and [(3)] (4) provides for transportation in 24 accordance with the terms and conditions of such [existing] transporta- 25 tion contract. 26 § 3. This act shall take effect on the first of July next succeeding 27 the date upon which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02177-01-5